Washington statutes.
RCW 18.200.070

Application—Requirements—Examination—Alternative standards.

(1) An applicant must file a written application on forms provided by the department showing to the satisfaction of the secretary, in consultation with the advisory committee, that the applicant meets the following requirements:

(a) The applicant possesses a baccalaureate degree with coursework appropriate for the profession approved by the secretary, or possesses equivalent training as determined by the secretary pursuant to subsections (3) and (5) of this section;

(b) The applicant has the amount of formal training, including the hours of classroom education and clinical practice, in areas of study as the secretary deems necessary and appropriate;

(c) The applicant has completed a clinical internship or residency in the professional area for which a license is sought in accordance with the standards, guidelines, or procedures for clinical internships or residencies inside or outside the state as established by the secretary, or that are otherwise substantially equivalent to the standards commonly accepted in the fields of orthotics and prosthetics as determined by the secretary pursuant to subsections (3) and (5) of this section. The secretary must set the internship as at least one year.

(2) An applicant for licensure as either an orthotist or prosthetist must pass all written and practical examinations that are required and approved by the secretary in consultation with the advisory committee.

(3) The standards and requirements for licensure established by the secretary must be substantially equal to the standards commonly accepted in the fields of orthotics and prosthetics.

(4) An applicant failing to make the required grade in the first examination may take up to three subsequent examinations as the applicant desires upon prepaying a fee, determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250, for each subsequent examination. Upon failing four examinations, the secretary may invalidate the original application and require remedial education before the person may take future examinations.

(5) The secretary may waive some of the education, examination, or experience requirements of this section if the secretary determines that the applicant meets alternative standards, established by the secretary through rule, that are substantially equivalent to the requirements in subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

[ 1997 c 285 s 8.]